Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.062

Initial educator certificates and paraeducator certificates—Application processing fee—Educator certification processing account.

(1) The legislature finds that the current economic environment requires that the state, when appropriate, charge for some of the services provided directly to the users of those services. The office of the superintendent of public instruction is currently supported with state funds to process certification fees. In addition, the legislature finds that the processing of certifications should be moved to an online system that allows educators to manage their certifications and provides better information to policymakers. The legislature intends to assess a certification processing fee to eliminate state-funded support of the cost to issue educator certificates.

(2) In addition to the certification fee established under RCW 28A.410.060 for certificated instructional staff as defined in RCW 28A.150.203, the superintendent of public instruction shall charge an application processing fee for initial educator certificates and subsequent actions, and paraeducator certificates and subsequent actions. The superintendent of public instruction shall establish the amount of the fee by rule under chapter 34.05 RCW. The superintendent shall set the fee at a sufficient level to defray the costs of administering the educator certification program under RCW 28A.300.040(9) and the paraeducator certificate program under chapter 28A.413 RCW. Revenue generated through the processing fee shall be deposited in the educator certification processing account.

(3) The educator certification processing account is established in the custody of the state treasurer. The superintendent of public instruction shall deposit in the account all moneys received from the fees collected in subsection (2) of this section. Moneys in the account may be spent only for the processing of educator certificates and subsequent actions and paraeducator certificates and subsequent actions. Disbursements from the account shall be on authorization of the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee. The account is subject to the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for disbursements.

[ 2017 c 237 s 16; 2011 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 23: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2011." [ 2011 1st sp.s. c 23 s 2.]